Hawaii statutes.
[§291-59] Enforcement. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, and in
addition to any other authority provided by law that is not inconsistent with
the purposes of this part:

(1) A law
enforcement officer may access the property of a private entity to enforce the
provisions of this part; and

(2) A
commissioned volunteer enforcement officer may access the property of a private
entity during normal business hours of the entity to enforce the provisions of
this part;

provided that
the private entity's parking lot contains a parking space reserved for persons
with disabilities. [L 2003, c 30, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next